ko: 호환 총기 플랫폼: AEG; BB탄 총; CO2; 전동; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; 스프링; 기타
th: แท่นติดตั้งปืนที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: AEG; ปืนบีบีกัน; CO2; ไฟฟ้า; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; สปริง; อื่นๆ
en: Compatible gun platform: AEG; BB Gun; CO2; Electric; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Spring; Other
pt-PT: Plataforma de armas compatível: AEG; Arma de BB; CO2; Elétrica; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Mola; Outro
hr-HR: Kompatibilna platforma za pištolj: AEG; Zračni pištolj (BB); CO2; Električno; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Na oprugu; Ostalo
sl-SI: Združljiva platforma za pištole: AEG; Zračna puška (BB); CO2; Električno; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Vzmet; Drugo
zh-CN: 适配枪械平台: AEG; BB 枪; CO2; 电动; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; 弹簧; 其他
sk-SK: Kompatibilná platforma pre zbrane: AEG; Vzduchovka (na BB broky); CO2; Elektrická; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Pružinová; Iné
fr: Plateforme compatible pour arme: AEG; Pistolet à billes (BB); CO2; Électrique; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; À ressort; Autre
ro-RO: Platformă de arme compatibilă: AEG; Armă BB; CO2; Electric; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Cu arc; Altele
tr: Uyumlu silah platformu: AEG; BB Tabanca; CO2; Elektrik; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Yaylı; Diğer
nb: Kompatibel våpenplattform: AEG; Luftgevær (BB); CO2; Elektrisk; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Fjær; Annet
de: Kompatible Waffenplattform: AEG; BB-Gun; CO2; Elektrisch; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Federdruck; Sonstige
lt-LT: Suderinama ginklo platforma: AEG; Šratinis ginklas; CO2; Elektrinis; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Spyruoklinis; Kita
cs: Kompatibilní platforma pro zbraně: AEG; Vzduchovka na BB broky; CO2; Elektrické; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Manuální (pružinové); Jiné
da: Kompatibel skydevåbenplatform: AEG; BB-våben; CO2; Elektrisk; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Fjeder; Andet
zh-TW: 相容的槍械平台: AEG; BB 槍; CO2; 電動; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; 彈簧; 其他
ru: Совместимая оружейная платформа: AEG; Пневматика (BB); CO2; Электропневматика; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Спринг; Другое
fi: Yhteensopiva asealusta: AEG; BB-ase; CO2; Sähkö; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Jousi; Muu
pl: Kompatybilna platforma broni: AEG; Wiatrówka BB; CO2; Elektryczna; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Sprężynowa; Inne
el: Συμβατή πλατφόρμα όπλων: AEG; Αεροβόλο BB; CO2; Ηλεκτρικό; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Ελατηρίου; Άλλο
hu: Kompatibilis fegyverplatform: AEG; BB fegyver; CO2; Elektromos; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Rugós; Egyéb
bg-BG: Съвместима оръжейна платформа: AEG; Въздушно оръжие с BB сачми; CO2; Електрическо; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Пружинно; Друго
it: Piattaforma per armi compatibile: AEG; BB Gun; CO2; Elettrica; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; A molla; Altro
es: Sistema de funcionamiento compatible: AEG; Pistola de balines; CO2; Eléctrica; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Resorte; Otro
pt-BR: Plataforma de armas compatível: AEG; Arma de chumbinho (BB); CO2; Elétrica; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Mola (Spring); Outro
nl: Compatibel gun-platform: AEG; BB-gun; CO2; Elektrisch; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Veer; Overig
vi: Nền tảng súng tương thích: AEG; Súng BB; CO2; Chạy bằng điện; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Lò xo; Khác
sv: Kompatibel vapenplattform: AEG; Luftvapen (BB); CO2; Elektrisk; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; Fjäder; Övrigt
ja: 互換性のあるガンプラットフォーム: AEG; BBガン; CO2; 電動; GBB; GBBR; HPA; NBB; スプリング式; その他